scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/pron.lexd
идик<pron>:уменьшласк_к_йид<pron>
ič<pron>:ничто<pron>
ич<pron>:ничто<pron>
yič<pron>:ничто<pron>
йич<pron>:ничто<pron>
yaka-čīn<pron>:все_до_одного<pron>
йака-чӣн<pron>:все_до_одного<pron>
akdigar<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
акдигар<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
yakdigar<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
йакдигар<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
ik-am<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
ik-amik<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
yam<pron>:этот<pron>
йам<pron>:этот<pron>
yamik<pron>:этот<pron>
йамик<pron>:этот<pron>
k-am<pron>:этот<pron>
к-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
k-amik<pron>:этот<pron>
к-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
ik-am<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
ik-amik<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
yam<pron>:этот<pron>
йам<pron>:этот<pron>
yamik<pron>:этот<pron>
йамик<pron>:этот<pron>
k-am<pron>:этот<pron>
к-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
k-amik<pron>:этот<pron>
к-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
yā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
yik-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йик-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
yikk-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йикк-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
k-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
к-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
yi<pron>:в_знач_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йи<pron>:в_знач_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
idik<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
идик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ik-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ик-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ikk-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
икк-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
yid<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
yidik<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йидик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
k-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
к-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
idik<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
идик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ik-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ик-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ikk-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
икк-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
yid<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
yidik<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йидик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
k-id<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
к-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
yi-rāng<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-рāнг<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
yi-rang<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-ранг<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
yi-rāng<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-рāнг<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-rang<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ранг<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-rāng-aθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
йи-рāнг-аθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
yi-rang-aθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
йи-ранг-аθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
yi-rāng-aθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-рāнг-аθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-rang-aθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ранг-аθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
i-ca<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
и-ца<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
yi-ca<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-ца<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
yi-cav<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-цав<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
i-ca<pron>:ничто<pron>
и-ца<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-ca<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ца<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-cav<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-цав<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-čāy<pron>:ктонибудь<pron>
йи-чāй<pron>:ктонибудь<pron>
yi-čāy<pron>:никто<pron>
йи-чāй<pron>:никто<pron>
yi-čê-<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чê-<pron>:когол<pron>
yi-či<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чи<pron>:когол<pron>
yi-čī-<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чӣ-<pron>:когол<pron>
yi-čê-<pron>:никого<pron>
йи-чê-<pron>:никого<pron>
yi-či<pron>:никого<pron>
йи-чи<pron>:никого<pron>
yi-čī-<pron>:никого<pron>
йи-чӣ-<pron>:никого<pron>
i-čīz<pron>:нечто<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:нечто<pron>
yi-čīz<pron>:нечто<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:нечто<pron>
i-čīz<pron>:ничто<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:ничто<pron>
yi-čīz<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:ничто<pron>
i-čīz<pron>:какойл<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:какойл<pron>
yi-čīz<pron>:какойл<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:какойл<pron>
yi-čīzaθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-чӣзаθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
yīw<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йӣw<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
yīwik<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йӣwик<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
yīwīk-aθ<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йӣwӣк-аθ<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
ik-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ik-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ikk-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yo-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yu<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ik-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ik-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ikk-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yo-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yu<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ik-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ik-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ikk-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yo-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
yu<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-o-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-u<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
k-am<pron>:вариант_указательного_местоимения_йам_с_усилительной_частицей<pron>
к-ам<pron>:вариант_указательного_местоимения_йам_с_усилительной_частицей<pron>
kāǰa<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷа<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰad<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷад<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰao<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷао<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰaho<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷаҳо<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰi<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷи<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰid<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷид<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰo<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷо<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰuo<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуо<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰuh<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуҳ<pron>:куда<pron>
kāǰuho<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуҳо<pron>:куда<pron>
kočor<pron>:то_самое<pron>
кочор<pron>:то_самое<pron>
kulaθ<pron>:все<pron>
кулаθ<pron>:все<pron>
kulaki<pron>:все<pron>
кулаки<pron>:все<pron>
kullaθ<pron>:все<pron>
куллаθ<pron>:все<pron>
kullaki<pron>:все<pron>
куллаки<pron>:все<pron>
kuli<pron>:весь<pron>
кули<pron>:весь<pron>
kulli<pron>:весь<pron>
кулли<pron>:весь<pron>
mam<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
мам<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
mim<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
мим<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
mam<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
мам<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
mim<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
мим<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
mam<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
мам<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
mim<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
мим<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
mam<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
мам<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
mim<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
мим<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
mam<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
мам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
mim<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
мим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
mā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
māð<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
māðen<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
me<pron>:их<pron>
ме<pron>:их<pron>
mev<pron>:их<pron>
мев<pron>:их<pron>
meven<pron>:их<pron>
мевен<pron>:их<pron>
mef<pron>:их<pron>
меф<pron>:их<pron>
mefen<pron>:их<pron>
мефен<pron>:их<pron>
mê-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
мê-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
mi<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
ми<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
mī-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
мӣ-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
padamard<pron>:тем<pron>
падамард<pron>:тем<pron>
padamird<pron>:тем<pron>
падамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
padumard<pron>:тем<pron>
падумард<pron>:тем<pron>
padumird<pron>:тем<pron>
падумирд<pron>:тем<pron>
sari<pron>:каждый<pron>
сари<pron>:каждый<pron>
tam-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
там-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
tamā-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамā-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
tama<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тама<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
tamayen<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамайен<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
tamům<pron>:весь<pron>
таму̊м<pron>:весь<pron>
to-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
то-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
tu<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
ту<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
tū-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
тӯ-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
fuk<pron>:весь<pron>
фук<pron>:весь<pron>
fuka<pron>:все<pron>
фука<pron>:все<pron>
